Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5. State Financial Assistance

§ 1561.
Tuition reduction.

In this section:

“Student” means a Vermont secondary student without a diploma regardless of age and regardless of whether the student is enrolled in a high school in Vermont.

“Full-time equivalent student” means the average of a Vermont school district’s three prior years’ full-time equivalent enrollment of students in the career technical center.

On behalf of a sending school district within Vermont, a career technical center shall receive from the Education Fund for each full-time equivalent student from the district 87 percent of the base education amount, and an equivalent amount shall be subtracted from the amount due to the sending district under section 4011 of this title. The amount sent to the career technical center and subtracted from the sending district shall be considered a revenue and an expenditure of the district and shall be reported as such in appropriate accounts and in the district’s annual budget.

Annually, the General Assembly shall appropriate funds to pay for a supplemental assistance grant per full-time equivalent student. The amount of the grant shall be equal to 35 percent of the base education amount for that year.

In any year following a year in which fall semester full-time equivalent enrollment of students at a career technical center increased by 20 percent or more over the previous fall semester, in addition to other aid, the career technical center shall receive an extra supplemental assistance grant equal to two-thirds of the 35 percent of the base education amount for that year, multiplied by the actual full-time equivalent enrollment increase. The next year, if the increase in fall semester full-time equivalent enrollment is less than 20 percent, in addition to other aid, the career technical center shall receive an extra supplemental assistance grant equal to one-third of the 35 percent of the base education amount for the year, multiplied by the actual full-time equivalent increase of the previous fall semester.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 46

, § 3, eff. May 13, 1987;

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 10, 10a;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. July 1, 1999;

2001, No. 63

, § 164b;

2003, No. 68

, § 18, eff. June 18, 2003;

2003, No. 76

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Feb. 17, 2004;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 188;

2005, No. 54

, § 12;

2009, No. 44

, §§ 18, 19, eff. May 21, 2009.

§ 1562.
Tryout classes.

From the monies annually available for use in career technical education, the State Board may reimburse part of the program cost attributable to programs designed to assist students in deciding whether to enroll in career technical courses. As a condition of such assistance, the program shall demonstrate that it has taken steps to encourage each student to consider enrolling in courses not traditional for that student’s gender.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2015, No. 23

, § 36.

§ 1563.
Transportation assistance.

It is the policy of the General Assembly to encourage Vermont students to enroll in career technical education courses. In furtherance of that policy, transportation assistance is provided for in this section to facilitate the enrollment of Vermont students in career technical education programs.

Transportation assistance shall be paid from the Education Fund to school districts that provide transportation to and from career technical education programs, regardless of whether the program is offered in a career technical center in the district’s designated service region or regions or is offered within the career technical center region at a location other than at a career technical center. Assistance shall be $1.50 per mile for actual number of miles traveled, in 1998 dollars adjusted annually by the annual price index for state and local government purchases of goods and services. Payments shall be made on or before December 10 and June 10. Requests submitted on or following May 15 shall be reimbursed in the next payment.

The State Board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. July 1, 1999;

2007, No. 66

, § 7.

§ 1564.
Repealed. 2009, No. 1 (Sp. Sess.), § E.511.1.

§ 1565.
Salary assistance.

The State Board shall reimburse a school district operating a career technical center for a portion of its cost in paying the salary of the following persons:

the director of career technical education;

a person whose principal duty is to provide guidance services for career technical students;

a person whose principal duty is to find job training opportunities for students during the time they are enrolled at the career technical center;

an assistant director for adult education;

an assistant director of career technical education, if the career technical center has full-time equivalent enrollment of at least 150 and the sending school population is at least 30 percent of the career technical center’s total full-time equivalent enrollment.

Assistance under this section shall be determined by a formula and standards established by rule of the State Board. The formula and those standards:

Shall provide different levels of support for different positions as follows:

Directors and guidance coordinators’ salary assistance shall be 50 percent of the State average salary and benefits for each position, or 50 percent of the actual salary and benefits for each individual, whichever is less.

Assistant directors, except for assistant directors for adult education, if the district is eligible, and co-op teachers’ salary assistance shall be 35 percent of the State average salary and benefits for each position or 35 percent of the actual salary and benefits for each individual, whichever is less.

Salary assistance for assistant directors for adult education shall be up to 50 percent of the State average salary and benefits paid to full-time assistant directors for adult education; salary assistance shall be prorated for part-time assistant directors. Salary assistance under this subdivision (1)(C) shall not be paid from the Education Fund to the extent that the obligation is not fully funded from the General Fund. State General Fund assistance shall be divided so that each district employing an assistant director receives the same base amount of State salary support. The base support shall be pro-rated for part-time assistant directors. Payment under this subsection (b) does not preclude a district from using other State and federal grants to supplement the actual salaries and benefits of assistant directors for adult education.

Shall require as a condition of assistance that the director:

Is responsible for the overall administration of all career technical programs.

Reports administratively to the superintendent of schools for the supervisory union of the school district that operates the center, or to a headmaster if the career technical center is not managed by a school board.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2007, No. 46

, § 5a, eff. May 23, 2007;

2007, No. 66

, § 8;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.004.1.

§ 1566.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(3), eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1567.
Repealed. 2001, No. 63, § 164d, eff. July 1, 2002.

§ 1568.
Reporting of information.

Annually, in accordance with a timeline, format, and process established by State Board rule, each CTE center shall report its costs and student enrollment, achievement, and performance measures to the Secretary. CTE center financial accounts shall be kept separately from those of the host high school in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board, which shall clearly delineate relevant costs and revenues.

If a CTE center fails to file financial or student information required under this section within the timelines established by rule of the State Board, the Secretary may withhold funds due under this chapter and shall subtract $100.00 per business day from funds due the center under this chapter. The Secretary may waive the $100.00 penalty upon appeal by the center for good cause.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 14; amended

1999, No. 10

, § 4;

2001, No. 63

, § 164c, eff. July 1, 2002;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 151, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.